Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1411
Joint authority; annual audit.

Any joint financing authority created pursuant to sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 shall be required to submit to an annual audit in the same manner as a public power district pursuant to sections 70-623 to 70-623.03.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 11.